Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
466D

respiratory therapists

Section

466D-1 Definitions

466D-2 Respiratory therapist program

466D-3 License required

466D-4 Physician supervision required

466D-5 Powers and duties of the director

466D-6 Fees; disposition

466D-7 Exemptions

466D-8 Application for license as a respiratory
therapist

466D-9 Licensure by endorsement

466D-10 Renewal of license

466D-11 Grounds for refusal to renew, reinstate,
or

restore a license and for revocation,
suspension,

denial, or condition of a license

Note

Subject to evaluation, this chapter is repealed effective
June 30, 2016. See §26H-4.

Employment of personnel. L 2010, c 178, §4.

Assessment under §26H-4 removed. L 2016, c 14, §2.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next